Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.111

Performance targets—Plans for achieving goals—Quarterly reports to governor.

The director shall set performance targets and approve plans for achieving measurable and specific goals for the agency. By January 2017, the appropriate organizational performance and accountability measures and performance targets shall be submitted to the governor. These measures and targets shall include measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable improvements related to service delivery and costs, operational efficiencies, and overall customer satisfaction. The agency shall develop a dashboard of key performance measures that will be updated quarterly and made available on the agency public website.

The director shall report to the governor on agency performance at least quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agency's website and accessible to the public.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 105; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 806.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.